Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 23
DIRECT PRIMARY CARE

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1115, see section 1 of chapter 151, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

Section

6-23-101. Definitions.

As used in this section:

"Direct primary care agreement" means a written agreement that:

Is between a patient, his or her legal representative, a government entity, or a patient's employer and a direct primary health-care provider;

Discloses and describes to the patient and to the person paying the direct primary care fee the primary care services to be provided in exchange for payment of a periodic fee;

Specifies the periodic fee required and any additional fees that may be charged;

May allow the periodic fee and any additional fees to be paid by a third party;

Prohibits the provider from submitting a fee-for-service claim for payment to a health insurance issuer for primary care services covered under the agreement and states that some services may be a covered benefit or covered service under the patient's health benefit plan as defined in section 10-16-102, at no cost to the patient;

Conspicuously and prominently discloses to all parties subject to the agreement that it is not health insurance and does not meet any individual health benefit plan mandate that may be required by federal law and the patient is not entitled to health insurance protections for consumers under title 10; and

Allows either party to terminate the agreement, in writing and with notice, as specified in the agreement and subject to refund terms and conditions in the agreement.

"Direct primary health-care provider" means an individual or legal entity that is licensed under article 240 of title 12 or part 1 of article 255 of title 12 to provide primary care services in this state and who enters into a direct primary care agreement. "Direct primary health-care provider" includes an individual primary care provider or other legal entity, alone or with others professionally associated with the individual or other legal entity.

"Primary care service" includes the screening, assessment, diagnosis, and treatment for the purpose of promotion of health or the detection and management of disease or injury within the competency and training of the primary care provider.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (HB 17-1115), ch. 151, p. 511, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1646, § 16, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 695, § 31, effective July 1.

6-23-102. Direct primary care - not regulated by the division of insurance.

Direct primary care is not insurance and is not regulated by the commissioner of insurance pursuant to title 10.

Direct primary health-care providers and direct primary care agreements that comply with this article 23 shall not be considered to be a health maintenance organization, insurer, insurance producer, or insurance and are not subject to title 10.

Offering or entering into a direct primary care agreement is not the business of insurance or the practice of underwriting.

A direct primary health-care provider or agent of a direct primary health-care provider is not required to obtain a certificate of authority or license to market, sell, or offer to sell a direct primary care agreement.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (HB 17-1115), ch. 151, p. 511, § 2, effective August 9; (2) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1417, § 117, effective August 9.

6-23-103. Direct primary health-care provider rights.

A direct primary health-care provider may:

Decline to accept patients whose health needs exceed the primary care services offered by the direct primary health-care provider; and

Terminate a direct primary care agreement if the termination allows for the transition of care to another health-care provider commensurate with the standards of professional responsibility within the state.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (HB 17-1115), ch. 151, p. 512, § 2, effective August 9.

6-23-104. Direct primary health-care providers - prohibitions.

A direct primary health-care provider may not discriminate in the selection of patients on the basis of age, citizenship status, color, disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, genetic information, health status, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, or any other protected class.

Direct primary health-care providers are subject to section 25.5-4-301.

This section does not prevent a direct primary health-care provider from providing primary care to patients who are not party to a direct primary care agreement.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (HB 17-1115), ch. 151, p. 512, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 890, § 11, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

6-23-105. Enforcement.

This article 23 is not subject to enforcement by the attorney general or the district attorney pursuant to this title 6.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (HB 17-1115), ch. 151, p. 512, § 2, effective August 9.